Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.120

Rights of persons without notice dealing with slayer or abuser.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect the rights of any person who, before the interests of the slayer or abuser have been adjudicated, purchases or has agreed to purchase, from the slayer or abuser for value and without notice property which the slayer or abuser would have acquired except for the terms of this chapter, but all proceeds received by the slayer or abuser from such sale shall be held by him or her in trust for the persons entitled to the property under the provisions of this chapter, and the slayer or abuser shall also be liable both for any portion of such proceeds which he or she may have dissipated and for any difference between the actual value of the property and the amount of such proceeds.

[ 2009 c 525 s 12; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.120. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 12.]